Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,147
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Teach in Nebraska Today Act:

(1) Default has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. 1085, as such section existed on January 1, 2022;

(2) Department means the State Department of Education;

(3) Grant means a grant for beginning or continuing service as a classroom teacher under the Teach in Nebraska Today Act;

(4) Program means the Teach in Nebraska Today Program created in section 79-8,148; and

(5) Teaching full-time means (a) teaching an average of at least four hours per contract day performing instructional duties as a full-time employee of an approved or accredited public, private, denominational, or parochial school in this state or (b) teaching an average of at least four hours per contract day performing dual-credit instructional duties for students of approved or accredited public, private, denominational, or parochial schools in this state while employed full-time at an accredited public or private nonprofit college or university in this state.

Laws 2022, LB1218, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1284, § 6.
April 17, 2024